New York, session 2025-2026, S3405.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph (i) of section 1411 of the not-for-profit corpo- 2 ration law is relettered paragraph (j) and a new paragraph (i) is added 3 to read as follows: 4 (i) Audit. 5 The comptroller has the authority to audit any local development 6 corporation incorporated or reincorporated pursuant to this section. 7 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD05203-01-5